Maryland, session 2025, HB0953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 647 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Tax – Property
4–201.1.
(a) In this section, “Program” means the Homeowner Protection Program
established under Title 14, Subtitle 8, Part VII of this article.
(E) EACH COLLECTOR THAT MAINTAINS A WEBSITE SHALL INCLUDE ON THE
COLLECTOR’S WEBSITE IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION:
(1) A CONCISE DESCRIPTION OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) A LINK TO THE APPLICATION FOR THE PROGRAM.
14–879.
(c) The Department shall obtain the following information concerning each
county’s tax sale process for the second immediately preceding taxable year:
(1) each type of charge that the county collects through its tax sale process,
including property taxes, water and sewer charges, environmental charges, and any other
local government charges;
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF REAL PROPERTY TAX ACCOUNTS IN THE
COUNTY DURING THE SECOND IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR AND THE
TOTAL NUMBER OF REAL PROPERTY TAX ACCOUNTS THAT BECAME DELINQUENT
DURING THE SECOND IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR;
(3) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF INTEREST ON OVERDUE COUNTY REAL
PROPERTY TAXES COLLECTED DURING THE SECOND IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
TAXABLE YEAR;
[(2)] (4) the length of time the tax on a property is required to be overdue
before the county begins the process to sell the property under Part III of this subtitle;
[(3)] (5) how frequently the county conducts a tax sale and the time of
year when the tax sale occurs;
[(4)] (6) whether the county conducts tax sales on behalf of municipal
corporations in the county and, if applicable, which municipal corporations;
[(5)] (7) the rate of interest the county charges on overdue property taxes
under § 14–603 of this title;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 647
[(6)] (8) the rate of redemption interest a property owner is required to
pay to redeem a property after a tax sale under § 14–820 of this subtitle;
[(7)] (9) the minimum threshold amount of unpaid taxes on a residential
property that will cause the county to put the property in tax sale under § 14–811(b) of this
subtitle;
[(8)] (10) regarding bid balance money in excess of the amount required
for the payment of taxes, interest, penalties, and costs of the sale of a property:
(i) the total aggregate amount of all bid balance money held by the
county in a special fund pending distribution to property owners under § 14–819(a) of this
subtitle;
(ii) the total aggregate amount of bid balance money distributed to
property owners under § 14–819(a) of this subtitle; and
(iii) the total aggregate amount of bid balance money transferred to
the county under § 14–819(b) and (c) of this subtitle;
[(9)] (11) whether the county has established a County Tax Sale
Ombudsman under § 2–112(e) of this article; and
[(10)] (12) a copy of the separate insert required to be mailed to property
owners under § 14–812(b) of this subtitle.
(d) The Department shall obtain:
(1) the number of counties and municipal corporations that have withheld
from sale under [§ 14–811(e)] § 14–811(H) of this subtitle a dwelling owned by a
homeowner who is low–income, at least 65 years old, or disabled;
(2) the eligibility criteria used by each county and municipal corporation to
withhold a dwelling from sale under [§ 14–811(e)] § 14–811(H) of this subtitle; and
(3) the number of dwellings withheld from sale by each county and
municipal corporation under [§ 14–811(e)] § 14–811(H) of this subtitle.
14–880.
(a) Each year, the Department shall issue a report that includes:
(1) an analysis and summary of the information collected through the
survey under § 14–879 of this subtitle; and
– 3 –

Ch. 647 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) the following information concerning the activities of the State Tax Sale
Ombudsman established under § 2–112 of this article in the preceding taxable year:
(i) the number of homeowners who contacted the Ombudsman;
(ii) the number of homeowners assisted by the Ombudsman to apply
for each of the tax credits under § 9–104 or § 9–105 of this article;
(iii) the number of homeowners assisted by the Ombudsman to apply
for other discount programs or public benefits and a brief summary of those programs and
benefits;
(iv) the number of homeowners referred by the Ombudsman to legal
services, housing counseling, and other social services, and a brief summary of those
services;
(v) the number of homeowners enrolled in the Homeowner
Protection Program under Part VII of this subtitle;
(vi) a summary of the implementation of the Homeowner Protection
Program under Part VII of this subtitle, including outreach to homeowners under §
14–886(d) of this subtitle;
(VII) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PERSONS MAKING A VOLUNTARY
DONATION TO THE HOMEOWNER PROTECTION PROGRAM UNDER PART VII OF THIS
SUBTITLE THROUGH THE WEBSITE UNDER § 4–201.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(VIII) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF VOLUNTARY DONATIONS MADE TO
THE HOMEOWNER PROTECTION PROGRAM UNDER PART VII OF THIS SUBTITLE
THROUGH THE WEBSITE UNDER § 4–201.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(IX) THE BALANCE OF FUNDS IN THE HOMEOWNER PROTECTION
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–891 OF THIS SUBTITLE AS OF THE DATE OF THE
REPORT, AND A DETAILED ACCOUNTING OF REVENUES RECEIVED BY THE
HOMEOWNER PROTECTION FUND AND EXPENDITURES MADE FROM THE
HOMEOWNER PROTECTION FUND IN THE PRECEDING TAXABLE YEAR;
[(vii)] (IX) (X) any statutory or administrative changes the
Ombudsman recommends to improve the administration of the Homeowner Protection
Program under Part VII of this subtitle; and
[(viii)] (X) (XI) any other relevant information.
14–884.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 647
(a) There is a Homeowner Protection Program administered by the Ombudsman
in the Department.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to divert vulnerable homeowners from the
private tax lien sale process under Part III of this subtitle into an alternative program with
the primary purpose of:
(1) minimizing tax collection costs to homeowners;
(2) assisting homeowners to pay their taxes; and
(3) allowing homeowners to remain in their homes.
14–885.
[(e) County or municipal governments may not be required to pay any costs of the
Program.]
14–886.
(c) The Ombudsman shall PRIORITIZE MAXIMIZING ENROLLMENT IN THE
PROGRAM BY:
(1) prominently [advertise] ADVERTISING the Program and [make]
MAKING applications available on the Ombudsman’s website; [and]
(2) [collaborate] COLLABORATING with local governments, community
organizations, and public and private providers of social services and benefits to raise
awareness of the Program and disseminate applications;
(3) STRONGLY ENCOURAGING ALL HOMEOWNERS WHO MEET THE
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS TO ENROLL IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(4) SCREENING EACH HOMEOWNER WHO CONTACTS THE
OMBUDSMAN FOR ELIGIBILITY FOR THE PROGRAM AND, IF THE HOMEOWNER
APPEARS TO BE ELIGIBLE, STRONGLY ENCOURAGING THE HOMEOWNER TO
COMPLETE AN APPLICATION FOR THE PROGRAM.
14–887.
(e) If a homeowner’s enrollment in the Program is canceled under [§ 14–886(d)]
§ 14–886(E) of this subtitle, the Department shall retain a lien on the homeowner’s
dwelling for the taxes owed to the Department but may not initiate any collection efforts or
otherwise act to enforce the lien until ownership of the dwelling is transferred.
– 5 –

Ch. 647 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–889.
(a) [(1) The Department may charge interest on unpaid taxes owed to the
Department at a rate not exceeding 6%.
(2) The Ombudsman may set a lower interest rate or waive interest
entirely at the Ombudsman’s discretion.] THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT CHARGE
INTEREST ON UNPAID TAXES OWED TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) [Other than the interest specified in subsection (a) of this section, the] THE
Department may not impose any fees or costs on a homeowner in addition to the taxes
owed.
14–891.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Homeowner Protection Fund.
(b) There is a Homeowner Protection Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to finance the Program.
(d) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) tax and interest payments made to the Department by homeowners
enrolled in the Program;
(2) voluntary donations to the Fund under § 4–201.1 of this article;
(3) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(4) MONEY PAID BY COUNTY GOVERNMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (H)
OF THIS SECTION;
[(4)] (5) interest earnings; and
[(5)] (6) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 647
(g) For each [of] fiscal [years 2023, 2024, and 2025] YEAR, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of [$750,000] $500,000 $250,000 OF
THE INTEREST ON OVERDUE STATE PROPERTY TAX to the Fund.
(H) (1) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, COUNTY GOVERNMENTS SHALL
COLLECTIVELY PAY $1,000,000 $500,000 TO THE FUND.
(2) THE AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE PAID UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ALLOCATED AMONG THE COUNTIES BASED ON THE
NUMBER OF REAL PROPERTY ACCOUNTS IN EACH COUNTY AS A PERCENTAGE OF THE
TOTAL NUMBER OF REAL PROPERTY ACCOUNTS STATEWIDE AS OF JULY 1 OF THE
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(3) THE AMOUNT PAID BY EACH COUNTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE DERIVED FROM INTEREST ON OVERDUE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX.
(4) EACH COUNTY SHALL REMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE COUNTY’S
SHARE OF THE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON
OR BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF EACH FISCAL YEAR.
[(h)] (I) (1) The Fund may be used only for any expenses associated with the
Program.
(2) The Fund may not be used for any expenses of the office of the State
Tax Sale Ombudsman that are not directly related to the Program.
[(i)] (J) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
[(j)] (K) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the
State budget.
[(k)] (L) The Fund is the exclusive source of funding for the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 7 –